Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202021-2,205
Application for certificate of authority.

(MBCA 15.03) (a) A foreign
corporation may apply for a certificate of authority to transact business
in this state by delivering an application to the Secretary of State for filing.
The application must set forth:

(1) The name of the foreign
corporation or, if its name is unavailable for use in this state, a corporate
name that satisfies the requirements of section 21-2,208;

(2) The name of the state
or country under whose law it is incorporated;

(3) Its date of incorporation and period
of duration;

(4)
The street address of its principal office;

(5) The street address of its registered office in
this state and the name of its current registered agent at that office. A
post office box number may be provided in addition to the street address;
and

(6)
The names and street addresses of its current directors and officers.

(b) The foreign corporation
shall deliver with the completed application a certificate of existence, or
a document of similar import, duly authenticated by the secretary of state
or other official having custody of corporate records in the state or country
under whose law it is incorporated. Such certificate or document shall not
bear a date of more than sixty days prior to the date the application is delivered.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 205.